California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A licensed educational psychologist shall retain a client’s health service records for a minimum of seven years from the date therapy is terminated. If the client is a minor, the client’s health service records shall be retained for a minimum of seven years from the date the client reaches 18 years of age. Health service records may be retained in either a written or an electronic format.

(b) This section shall apply only to the records of a client whose therapy is terminated on or after January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 312, Sec. 2.   (SB 578)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.52.

All consideration, compensation, or remuneration received by the licensee shall be in relation to professional counseling services actually provided by the licensee. Nothing in this section shall prevent collaboration among two or more licensees in a case. However, no fee shall be charged for that collaboration, except when disclosure of the fee has been made to the client.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement [4989.54. - 4989.66.]

4989.54.

The board may deny a license or may suspend or revoke the license of a licensee if the person has been guilty of unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of an educational psychologist.

(1) The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence only of the fact that the conviction occurred.

(2) The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline or to determine if
 the conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee under this chapter.

(3) A conviction has the same meaning as defined in Section 7.5.

(4) The board may order a license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence. All actions pursuant to this subdivision shall be taken pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Securing a license by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation on an application for licensure submitted to the board, whether engaged in by an applicant for a
 license or by a licensee in support of an application for licensure.

(c) Administering to themselves a controlled substance or using any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022 or an alcoholic beverage to the extent, or in a manner, as to be dangerous or injurious to themselves or to any other person or to the public or to the extent that the use impairs their ability to safely perform the functions authorized by the license. The board shall deny an application for a license or revoke the license of any person, other than one who is licensed as a physician and surgeon, who uses or offers to use drugs in the course of performing educational psychology.

(d) Failure to comply with the procedures set forth in Section 2290.5 when delivering health care via telehealth.

(e) Advertising in a manner that is false, fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive, as defined in Section 651.

(f) Violating, attempting to violate, or conspiring to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board.

(g) Commission of any dishonest, corrupt, or fraudulent act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee.

(h) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action imposed by another state or territory or possession of the United States or by any other governmental agency, on a license, certificate, or registration to practice educational
 psychology or any other healing art. A certified copy of the disciplinary action, decision, or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(i) Revocation, suspension, or restriction by the board of a license, certificate, or registration to practice as an educational psychologist, a clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or marriage and family therapist.

(j) Failure to keep records consistent with sound clinical judgment, the standards of the profession, and the nature of the services being rendered.

(k) Gross negligence or incompetence in the practice of educational psychology.

(l) Misrepresentation as to the type or status of a
 license held by the licensee or otherwise misrepresenting or permitting misrepresentation of the licensee’s education, professional qualifications, or professional affiliations to any person or entity.

(m) Intentionally or recklessly causing physical or emotional harm to any client.

(n) Engaging in sexual relations with a client or a former client within two years following termination of professional services, soliciting sexual relations with a client, or committing an act of sexual abuse or sexual misconduct with a client or committing an act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act or solicitation is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensed educational psychologist.

(o) Before the commencement of treatment, failing to disclose to the client or prospective client the fee to be charged for the professional services or the basis upon which that fee will be computed.

(p) Paying, accepting, or soliciting any consideration, compensation, or remuneration, whether monetary or otherwise, for the referral of professional clients.

(q) Failing to maintain confidentiality, except as otherwise required or permitted by law, of all information that has been received from a client in confidence during the course of treatment and all information about the client that is obtained from tests or other means.

(r) Performing, holding oneself out as being able to perform, offering to
 perform, or permitting any unlicensed person under supervision to perform, any professional services beyond the scope of the license authorized by this chapter or beyond the person’s field or fields of competence as established by the person’s education, training, or experience. For purposes of this subdivision, “unlicensed person” includes, but is not limited to, an applicant for licensure, an associate, an intern, or a trainee under the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Practice Act (Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980)), the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991)), or the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act (Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10)).

(s) Reproducing or describing in public, or in any publication subject to general public distribution, any psychological test or other
 assessment device the value of which depends in whole or in part on the naivete of the subject in ways that might invalidate the test or device. An educational psychologist shall limit access to the test or device to persons with professional interests who can be expected to safeguard its use.

(t) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to engage in conduct requiring a license under this chapter.

(u) When employed by another person or agency, encouraging, either orally or in writing, the employer’s or agency’s clientele to utilize the person’s private practice for further counseling without the approval of the employing agency or administration.

(v) Failing to comply with the child abuse reporting requirements of Section
 11166 of the Penal Code.

(w) Failing to comply with the elder and adult dependent abuse reporting requirements of Section 15630 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(x) Willful violation of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(y) (1) Engaging in an act described in Section 261, 286, 287, or 289 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code with a minor or an act described in Section 288 or 288.5 of the Penal Code regardless of whether the act occurred prior to or after the time the registration or license was issued by the board. An act described in this subdivision occurring prior to the effective date of this subdivision shall
 constitute unprofessional conduct and shall subject the licensee to refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license under this section.

(2) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that protection of the public, and in particular minors, from sexual misconduct by a licensee is a compelling governmental interest, and that the ability to suspend or revoke a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section is equally important to protecting the public as is the ability to refuse a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section.

(z) Engaging in any conduct that subverts or attempts to subvert any licensing examination or the administration of the examination as described in Section 123.

(aa) Impersonation of another by any licensee or applicant for a license, or, in the case of a licensee, allowing any other person to use the person’s license.

(ab) Permitting an unlicensed person under the licensee’s supervision or control to perform, or permitting that person to hold themselves out as competent to perform, mental health services beyond the unlicensed person’s level of education, training, or experience. For purposes of this subdivision, “unlicensed person” is defined in subdivision (r).

(ac) The violation of any statute or regulation governing the gaining and supervision of experience of an unlicensed person, including an unlicensed person identified in subdivision (ab), by a licensee that violates
 this chapter, the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Practice Act (Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980)), the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991)), the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act (Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10)), or any rules or regulations adopted by the board pursuant to those provisions. For purposes of this subdivision, “unlicensed person” is defined in subdivision (r).

(ad) The violation of any statute or regulation governing the gaining and supervision of experience of an unlicensed person required by the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Practice Act (Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980)), the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991)), or the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act (Chapter 16
 (commencing with Section 4999.10)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 72.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.55.

(a) The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall require an applicant for licensure as an educational psychologist, as defined in Sections 4989.14 and 4989.20, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 16.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.56.

The board shall revoke the license of a licensee, other than one who is also licensed as a physician and surgeon, who uses or offers to use drugs in the course of his or her practice as an educational psychologist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.58.

The board shall revoke the license of a licensee upon a decision that contains a finding of fact that the licensee engaged in an act of sexual contact, as defined in Section 729, when that act is with a client, or with a former client and the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of engaging in that act. The revocation shall not be stayed by the administrative law judge or the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.60.

A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not, until the reinstatement of his or her license, engage in any activity to which the license relates or any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.62.

All proceedings by the board to suspend, revoke, or to take other disciplinary action against a licensee shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.64.

In addition to other proceedings provided for in this chapter, whenever a person has engaged, or is about to engage, in an act or practice that constitutes, or will constitute, an offense against this chapter, the superior court in and for the county where the act or practice takes place, or is about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining that conduct on application of the board, the Attorney General, or the district attorney of the county. The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.66.

A person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [4989.68. - 4989.70.]

4989.68.

(a) The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of educational psychologists:

(1) The application fee for licensure shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) The fee for issuance of the initial license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(3) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher
 amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(4) The delinquency fee shall be one-half of the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire shall be subject to the delinquency fee.

(5) The written examination fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500). An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, once having been scheduled, shall forfeit any examination fees they paid.

(6) The fee for rescoring a written examination shall be twenty dollars ($20).

(7) The fee for issuance of a replacement registration, license, or certificate shall be twenty dollars ($20).

(8) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(9) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 43.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4989.70.

The board shall report each month to the Controller the amount and source of all revenue received pursuant to this chapter and at the same time pay the entire amount thereof into the State Treasury for credit to the Behavioral Sciences Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13.7. Board of Behavioral Sciences [4990. - 4990.42.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [4990. - 4990.26.3.]

4990.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs, a Board of Behavioral Sciences that consists of the following members:

(1) Two state licensed clinical social workers.

(2) One state licensed educational psychologist.

(3) Two state licensed marriage and family therapists.

(4) One state licensed professional clinical counselor.

(5) Seven public members.

(b) Each member, except the
 seven public members, shall have at least two years of experience in their profession.

(c) Each member shall reside in the State of California.

(d) The Governor shall appoint five of the public members and the six licensed members with the advice and consent of the Senate. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(e) Each member of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years. A member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules or the Speaker of the Assembly shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successor or until one year from the expiration date of the term for which they were appointed, whichever first occurs. Pursuant to Section
 1774 of the Government Code, a member appointed by the Governor shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successor or until 60 days from the expiration date of the term for which they were appointed, whichever first occurs.

(f) A vacancy on the board shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term by the authority who appointed the member whose membership was vacated.

(g) Not later than the first of June of each calendar year, the board shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from its membership.

(h) Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and reimbursement of expenses as provided in Section 103.

(i) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 73.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.01.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the repeal of Section 4990 renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 74.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.02.

“Board,” as used in this chapter, Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), Chapter 13.5 (commencing with Section 4989.10), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991), and Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) means the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 45.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.04.

(a) The board shall appoint an executive officer. This position is designated as a confidential position and is exempt from civil service under subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution.

(b) The executive officer serves at the pleasure of the board.

(c) The executive officer shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in them by this chapter.

(d) With the approval of the director, the board shall fix the salary of the executive officer.

(e) The chairperson and executive officer may call meetings of
 the board and any duly appointed committee at a specified time and place. For purposes of this section, “call meetings” means setting the agenda, time, date, or place for any meeting of the board or any committee.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 75.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.06.

Subject to the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and except as provided by Sections 155, 156, and 159.5, the board may employ any clerical, technical, and other personnel as it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and the other chapters it administers and enforces, within budget limitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.07.

(a) An applicant, registrant, or licensee who has an electronic mail address shall provide the board with that electronic mail address no later than July 1, 2022. The electronic mail address shall be considered confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

(b) An applicant, registrant, and licensee shall provide to the board any and all changes to their electronic mail address no later than 30 calendar days after the changes have occurred.

(c) The board shall, with each renewal application, remind licensees and registrants of their obligation to report and keep current their electronic mail address with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 46.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.08.

The board shall keep an accurate record of all of its proceedings and a record of all applicants for licensure and all individuals to whom it has issued a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.09.

The board shall not publish on the Internet the final determination of a citation and fine of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or less issued against a licensee or registrant pursuant to Section 125.9 for a period of time in excess of five years from the date of issuance of the citation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 65.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.10.

The board may conduct research in, and make studies of problems involved in, the maintaining of professional standards among those engaged in the professions it licenses and may publish its recommendations thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.12.

The duty of administering and enforcing this chapter, Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), Chapter 13.5 (commencing with Section 4989.10), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991), and Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) is vested in the board and the executive officer subject to, and under the direction of, the board. In the performance of this duty, the board and the executive officer have all the powers and are subject to all the responsibilities vested in, and imposed upon, the head of a department by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 46.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.13.

For purposes of license and registration verification, a person may rely upon the licensing and registration information as it is displayed on the board’s internet website that includes the issuance and expiration dates of any license or registration issued by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 60.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.14.

The board shall have and use a seal bearing the words “The Board of Behavioral Sciences,” and shall otherwise conform to Section 107.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.16.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.18.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the board employ its resources for each and all of the following functions:

(a) The licensure of marriage and family therapists, clinical social workers, professional clinical counselors, and educational psychologists.

(b) The development and administration of licensure examinations and examination procedures consistent with prevailing standards for the validation and use of licensing and certification tests. Examinations shall measure knowledge and abilities demonstrably important to the safe, effective practice of the profession.

(c) Enforcement of laws designed to protect the public from incompetent, unethical, or unprofessional practitioners.

(d) Consumer education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 47.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.20.

(a) The board may adopt rules and regulations as necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and the other chapters it administers and enforces. The adoption, amendment, or repeal of those rules and regulations shall be made in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations requiring the following:

(1) That the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a marriage and family therapist corporation, a licensed clinical social worker corporation, or a professional
 clinical counselor corporation include a provision whereby the capital stock of that corporation owned by a disqualified person, as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), or a deceased person shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of that corporation within the time that the rules and regulations may provide.

(2) That a marriage and family therapist corporation, a licensed clinical social worker corporation, or a professional clinical counselor corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 11.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.22.

(a) The Behavioral Sciences Fund shall be used for the purposes of carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this chapter and the chapters listed in Section 4990.12. All moneys in the fund shall be expended, upon appropriation of the Legislature, by the board for the purposes of the programs under its jurisdiction.

(b) The board shall keep records that reasonably ensure that funds expended in the administration of each licensure or registration category shall bear a reasonable relation to the revenue derived from each category and report to the department no
 later than May 31 of each year on those expenditures.

(c) Surpluses, if any, may be used by the board in a manner that bears a reasonable relation to the revenue derived from each licensure or registration category and may include, but not be limited to, expenditures for education and research related to each of the licensing or registration categories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 458, Sec. 3.   (AB 2191)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.24.

The powers and duties of the board, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to the review required by Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 473).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.26.

Wherever “Board of Behavioral Science Examiners,” “Board of Social Work Examiners of the State of California,” or “Social Worker and Marriage Counselor Qualifications Board of the State of California” is used in any law or regulations of this state, it shall mean the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.26.1.

(a) Any person applying for a license or registration as a marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, or professional clinical counselor shall, in addition to any other requirements, show by evidence satisfactory to the board that they have completed training in human sexuality as a condition of licensure.

(b) “Human sexuality” as used in this section means the study of a human being as a sexual being and how a human being functions with respect thereto.

(c) The content and length of the training shall be determined by the board.

(d) If the board proposes to establish a training program in human sexuality, the board shall first consult with other licensing boards or agencies that have established or propose to establish a training program in human sexuality to ensure that the programs are compatible in scope and content.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 76.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.26.2.

(a) The Legislature finds that there is a need to ensure that professionals of the healing arts who have demonstrable contact with victims and potential victims of child, elder, and dependent adult abuse, and abusers and potential abusers of children, elders, and dependent adults are provided with adequate and appropriate training regarding the assessment and reporting of child, elder, and dependent adult abuse that will ameliorate, reduce, and eliminate the trauma of abuse and neglect and ensure the reporting of abuse in a timely manner to prevent additional occurrences.

(b) The board shall establish required training in the area of child abuse assessment
 and reporting for all persons applying for initial licensure and renewal of licensure as a clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or marriage and family therapist. This training shall be required one time only for all persons applying for initial licensure or for licensure renewal.

(c) All persons applying for initial licensure or renewal of a license as a clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or marriage and family therapist shall, in addition to all other requirements for licensure or renewal, have completed coursework or training in child abuse assessment and reporting that meets the requirements of this section, including detailed knowledge of the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code). The training shall
 meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be obtained from one of the following sources:

(A) An accredited or approved educational institution, as defined in Sections 4980.36, 4980.37, 4996.18, and 4999.12, including extension courses offered by those institutions.

(B) A continuing education provider, as specified by the board by regulation.

(C) A course sponsored or offered by a professional association or a local, county, or state department of health or mental health for continuing education and approved or accepted by the board.

(2) Have a minimum of seven contact hours.

(3) Include the study of the assessment and method of reporting of sexual assault, neglect, severe neglect, general neglect, willful cruelty or unjustifiable punishment, corporal punishment or injury, and abuse in out-of-home care. The training shall also include physical and behavioral indicators of abuse, crisis counseling techniques, community resources, rights and responsibilities of reporting, consequences of failure to report, caring for a child’s needs after a report is made, sensitivity to previously abused children and adults, and implications and methods of treatment for children and adults.

(4) An applicant shall provide the board with documentation of completion of the required child abuse training.

(d) The board shall exempt an applicant who applies for an exemption from this section and who shows to the satisfaction of the board that there would be no need for the training in the applicant’s practice because of the nature of that practice.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a person licensed as a clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or marriage and family therapist have minimal but appropriate training in the areas of child, elder, and dependent adult abuse assessment and reporting. It is not intended that, by solely complying with this section, a practitioner is fully trained in the subject of treatment of child, elder, and dependent adult abuse victims and abusers.

(f) The board is encouraged to include coursework regarding the
 assessment and reporting of elder and dependent adult abuse in the required training on aging and long-term care issues prior to licensure or license renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 77.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.26.3.

(a) The board shall consider adoption of continuing education requirements including training in the area of recognizing chemical dependency and early intervention for all persons applying for renewal of a license as a clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist, or professional clinical counselor.

(b) Prior to the adoption of any regulations imposing continuing education relating to alcohol and other chemical dependency, the board is urged to consider coursework to include, but not necessarily be limited to, the following topics:

(1) Historical and contemporary perspectives on alcohol and other
 drug abuse.

(2) Extent of the alcohol and drug abuse epidemic and its effects on the individual, family, and community.

(3) Recognizing the symptoms of alcoholism and drug addiction.

(4) Making appropriate interpretations, interventions, and referrals.

(5) Recognizing and intervening with affected family members.

(6) Learning about current programs of recovery, such as 12-step programs, and how therapists can effectively utilize these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 78.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Disciplinary Actions [4990.28. - 4990.42.]

4990.28.

The board may refuse to issue a registration or license under the chapters it administers and enforces whenever it appears that the applicant may be unable to practice his or her profession safely due to mental illness or chemical dependency. The procedures set forth in Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 shall apply to denial of a license or registration pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4990.30.

(a) A licensed marriage and family therapist, associate marriage and family therapist, licensed clinical social worker, associate clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, associate professional clinical counselor, or licensed educational psychologist whose license or registration has been revoked, suspended, or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of the penalty, including modification or termination of probation. The petition shall be on a form provided by the board and shall state any facts and information as may be required by the board including, but not limited to, proof of compliance with the terms and conditions of the underlying disciplinary order. The petition shall be verified by the petitioner who shall file an original and sufficient copies of the
 petition, together with any supporting documents, for the members of the board, the administrative law judge, and the Attorney General.

(b) The licensee or registrant may file the petition on or after the expiration of the following timeframes, each of which excludes any periods during which the probation was tolled, and commences on the effective date of the decision ordering the disciplinary action or, if the order of the board, or any portion of it, is stayed by the board itself or by the superior court, from the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety:

(1) Three years for reinstatement of a license or registration that was revoked for unprofessional conduct, except that the board may, in its sole discretion, specify in its revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after two years. A registrant who is ineligible for
 reinstatement pursuant to Section 4984.01, 4996.28, or 4999.100 may apply for a subsequent registration number.

(2) Two years for early termination of any probation period of three years or more.

(3) One year for modification of a condition, reinstatement of a license or registration revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years. A registrant who is ineligible for reinstatement pursuant to Section 4984.01, 4996.28, or 4999.100 may apply for a subsequent registration number.

(c) The petition may be heard by the board itself or the board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge pursuant to Section 11512 of the Government Code.

(d) If the petition is to be heard by the board, the petitioner may
 request that the board schedule the hearing on the petition for a board meeting at a specific city where the board regularly meets.

(e) The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the hearing on the petition and an opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board or the administrative law judge.

(f) The petitioner shall at all times have the burden of production and proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that they are entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(g) The board, when it is hearing the petition itself, or an administrative law judge sitting for the board, may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined,
 the petitioner’s activities during the time their license or registration was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability.

(h) The hearing may be continued from time to time as the board or the administrative law judge deems appropriate but in no case may the hearing on the petition be delayed more than 180 days from its filing without the consent of the petitioner.
